District of Columbia statutes.
16-1363

Judgment.

Judgment upon a verdict returned pursuant to section 16-1361 or any award contained therein shall be entered against the United States in favor of the parties entitled for the sums awarded as just compensation, respectively, for the property condemned for the use of the United States.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 580, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1363.
1973 Ed., § 16-1363.